Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202539-893
Act; applicability.

The provisions of the Interstate Bridge Act of 1959 are intended to be cumulative to, and not amendatory of, sections 39-1301 to 39-1393.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 3, p. 635;

Laws 1993, LB 15, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1038, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB271, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB36, § 27.